src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
čoma+A:čoma A_MUNA  "kaunis" ;
rusked+A:ruskedA1 A_RUSKED  "punainen" ;
uzʼ+A:ud A_UZ1  "uusi" ;
administrativiž-territorialine+A:administrativiž-territoriali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
agulalaine+A:agulala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
ahtaz+A:aht A_SEIBAZ  "" ;
aktivine+A:aktivi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
alastoi+A:alasto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
aleksandrijalaine+A:aleksandrijala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
andorralaine+A:andorrala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
arabilaine+A:arabila A_CIPUINE  "" ;
arg+A:arg A_MARJ  "" ;
armaz+A:arm A_SEIBAZ  "" ;
avar+A:avar A_JAUH  "" ;
avstrijalaiž-amerikalaine+A:avstrijalaiž-amerikala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
avtonomine+A:avtonomi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
ažlak+A:ažlak A_JAUH  "" ;
balkarijalaine+A:balkarijala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
bolgarijalaine+A:bolgarijala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
bumagasine+A:bumagasi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
burätalaine+A:burätala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
demonstrativine+A:demonstrativi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
edahaine+A:edaha A_CIPUINE  "" ;
ehtmatoi+A:ehtmato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
elokaz+A:eloka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
elʼgetoi+A:elʼgeto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
estilaiž-venälaine+A:estilaiž-#venäla A_CIPUINE  "" ;
ezine+A:ezi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
ezmäine+A:ezmä A_CIPUINE  "" ;
federaline+A:federali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
gagurakaz+A:gaguraka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
gangralaine+A:gangrala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
gorʼahine+A:gorʼahi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
gudžaratalaine+A:gudžaratala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
hahk+A:hahk A_MARJ  "" ;
hajutoi+A:hajuto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
harv+A:harv A_MARJ  "" ;
hen+A:hen A_JAUH  "" ;
henoine+A:heno A_CIPUINE  "" ;
hered+A:hered A_MARJ  "" ;
hoik+A:hoik A_POIG  "" ;
hoivitoi+A:hoivito A_KENGATOI  "" ;
holekaz+A:holeka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
hond+A:hond A_JAUH  "" ;
hotk+A:hotk A_POIG  "" ;
hura+A:hur A_MUNA  "" ;
häčak+A:häčak A_JAUH  "" ;
hörčak+A:hörčak A_JAUH  "" ;
höšak+A:höšak A_JAUH  "" ;
igähine+A:igähi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
ilokaz+A:iloka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
indižfidžilaine+A:indižfidžila A_CIPUINE  "" ;
irkutskalaine+A:irkutskala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
itelʼmenalaine+A:itelʼmenala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
izo+A:izo A_NADO  "" ;
ičhine+A:ičhi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
jalo+A:jalo A_NADO  "" ;
jenisejalaine+A:jenisejala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
jogahine+A:jogahi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
jogapäiväline+A:joga#päiväli A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
jädumatoi+A:jädumato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
jähine+A:jähi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
järed+A:järed A_MARJ  "" ;
järgenduseline+A:järgenduseli A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
jüged+A:jüged A_MARJ  "" ;
kahesaballaine+A:kahesaballa A_CIPUINE  "" ;
kaid+A:kaid A_MARJ  "" ;
kajed+A:kajed A_MARJ  "" ;
kambak+A:kambak A_JAUH  "" ;
kanadalaine+A:kanadala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
karged+A:karged A_OIGED  "" ;
karvakaz+A:karvaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
katromalaine+A:katromala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
kauged+A:kauged A_OIGED  "" ;
kebn+A:kebn A_MARJ  "" ;
kehker+A:kehker A_POIG  "" ;
kelʼdmatoi+A:kelʼdmato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
kengätoi+A:kengäto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
kipralaine+A:kiprala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
kirjav+A:kirjav A_POIG  "" ;
kivine+A:kivi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
koivuine+A:koivu A_CIPUINE  "" ;
komed+A:komed A_MARJ  "" ;
korged+A:korged A_OIGED  "" ;
koumanzʼ+A:kouman A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
kova+A:kov A_MUNA  "" ;
kover+A:kover A_POIG  "" ;
koverikaz+A:koverika A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
krimantatarlaine+A:krimantatarla A_CIPUINE  "" ;
kudamb+A:kudamb A_POIG  "" ;
kuhruikaz+A:kuhruika A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
kundali+A:kundali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
käbed+A:käbed A_MARJ  "" ;
kädekaz+A:kädeka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
käred+A:käred A_MARJ  "" ;
külähine+A:külähi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
kümnenzʼ+A:kümnen A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
küps+A:küps A_POIG  "" ;
laih+A:laih A_MARJ  "" ;
lapak+A:lapak A_JAUH  "" ;
latvijalaine+A:latvijala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
led+A:led A_JAUH  "" ;
lehed+A:lehed A_MARJ  "" ;
letkesine+A:letkesi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
leved+A:leved A_MARJ  "" ;
libed+A:libed A_MARJ  "" ;
livanalaine+A:livanala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
londuseline+A:londuseli A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
luja+A:luj A_MUNA  "" ;
läheline+A:läheli A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
lähine+A:lähi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
lühüd+A:lühüd A_MARJ  "" ;
madal+A:madal A_POIG  "" ;
maged+A:maged A_MARJ  "" ;
magukaz+A:maguka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
mairhekaz+A:mairheka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
maks+A:maks A_MARJ  "" ;
maksutoi+A:maksuto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
melekaz+A:meleka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
melev+A:melev A_POIG  "" ;
merelaine+A:merela A_CIPUINE  "" ;
mererandatoi+A:mererandato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
muiged+A:muiged A_OIGED  "" ;
mujutoi+A:mujuto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
municipaline+A:municipali A_TOSHTMINE  "kunnallinen" ;
must+A:must A_MARJ  "musta" ;
mučker+A:mučker A_MARJ  "" ;
märg+A:märg A_POIG  "" ;
naimatoi+A:naimato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
nanalaine+A:nanala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
nellänzʼ+A:nellän A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
nenakaz+A:nenaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
neps+A:neps A_MARJ  "" ;
nimetoi+A:nimeto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
ninev+A:ninev A_MARJ  "" ;
nivhalaine+A:nivhala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
norʼ+A:nor A_SAR1  "" ;
notked+A:notked A_MARJ  "" ;
notked+A:notked A_OIGED  "" ;
nozol+A:nozol A_POIG  "" ;
nälʼghine+A:nälʼghi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
näpine+A:näpi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
oficialine+A:oficiali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
ogibal+A:ogibal A_MARJ  "" ;
oiged+A:oiged A_OIGED  "" ;
oma+A:om A_MUNA  "" ;
ortodoksine+A:ortodoksi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
ozatoi+A:ozato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
pačakokaz+A:pačakoka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
pehmed+A:pehmed A_OIGED  "" ;
pendžabalaine+A:pendžabala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
penʼ+A:pen A_KEL1  "" ;
periodine+A:periodi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
pil%ʼvesine+A:pilʼvesi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
pimed+A:pimed A_MARJ  "" ;
piču+A:piču A_NADO  "" ;
policentri+A:policentri A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
politine+A:politi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
porn+A:porn A_MARJ  "" ;
portugalijalaiž-angolalaine+A:portugalijalaiž-angolala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
professionaline+A:professionali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
puhtaz+A:puht A_SEIBAZ  "" ;
päipaštokaz+A:päipaštoka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
pölükaz+A:pölüka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
rahvahatoi+A:rahvahato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
raibak+A:raibak A_JAUH  "" ;
rauk+A:rauk A_MARJ  "" ;
razvakaz+A:razvaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
redukaz+A:reduka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
reigukaz+A:reiguka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
ripmatoi+A:ripmato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
rizu+A:rizu A_NADO  "" ;
rohked+A:rohked A_OIGED  "" ;
rusked+A:rusked A_RUSKED  "" ;
ruskedverine+A:rusked#veri A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
rutulalaine+A:rutulala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
röunatoi+A:röunato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
sanged+A:sanged A_OIGED  "" ;
satusetoi+A:satuseto A_KENGATOI  "" ;
seičemenzʼ+A:seičemen A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
seižmatoi+A:seižmato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
selʼged+A:selʼged A_OIGED  "" ;
setulaine+A:setula A_CIPUINE  "" ;
siled+A:siled A_MARJ  "" ;
solakaz+A:solaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
sorav+A:sorav A_POIG  "" ;
specialine+A:speciali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
sula+A:sul A_MUNA  "" ;
surʼ+A:sur A_SAR1  "" ;
surʼkulu+A:surʼkulu A_NADO  "" ;
suviazijalaine+A:suviazijala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
tabj+A:tabj A_MARJ  "" ;
tark+A:tark A_MARJ  "" ;
tazo+A:tazo A_NADO  "" ;
terav+A:terav A_POIG  "" ;
terveh+A:terv A_LANDEH  "" ;
todesine+A:todesi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
tomukaz+A:tomuka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
toreh+A:tor A_LANDEH  "" ;
totaralaine+A:totarala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
tundmatoi+A:tundmato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
tünʼ+A:tün A_KEL1  "" ;
udatikaz+A:udatika A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
uelʼsalaine+A:uelʼsala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
upak+A:upak A_JAUH  "" ;
ustavakaz+A:ustavaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
uzʼ+A:ud A_UZ1  "" ;
vahv+A:vahv A_MARJ  "" ;
vajehtamatoi+A:vajehtamato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
valdmererandatoi+A:valdmererandato A_KENGATOI  "" ;
vanh+A:vanh A_MARJ  "" ;
varmed+A:varmed A_OIGED  "" ;
varuline+A:varuli A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
vauged+A:vauged A_OIGED  "" ;
vauh+A:vauh A_MARJ  "" ;
vavilonalaine+A:vavilonala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
verhine+A:verhi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
vezo+A:vezo A_NADO  "" ;
videnzʼ+A:viden A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
vihand+A:vihand A_MARJ  "" ;
viher+A:viher A_POIG  "" ;
vihmakaz+A:vihmaka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
vilu+A:vilu A_NADO  "" ;
vilukaz+A:viluka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
virulaine+A:virula A_CIPUINE  "" ;
vokaline+A:vokali A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
vouvaz+A:vouv A_SEIBAZ  "" ;
vägekaz+A:vägeka A_VEDEKAZ  "" ;
vägev+A:vägev A_POIG  "" ;
vägitoi+A:vägito A_KENGATOI  "" ;
vägеhine+A:vägеhi A_TOSHTMINE  "" ;
vähähk+A:vähähk A_JAUH  "" ;
vär+A:vär A_POIG  "" ;
änʼkulund+A:änʼ#kulund A_MARJ  "" ;
äred+A:äred A_MARJ  "" ;
ühesanzʼ+A:ühesan A_VIDENZ1  "" ;
čerkesogajalaine+A:čerkesogajala A_CIPUINE  "" ;
čoma+A:čom A_MUNA  "" ;
čopak+A:čopak A_JAUH  "" ;
